Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2817YC (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. MORATORIUM ââ PROGRAM FUNDING RECIPIENTS. The 1 economic development authority shall impose a moratorium 2 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2028, on all 3 programs administered by the economic development authority and 4 the funds available to each program, for the four most populous 5 counties in the state. 6